Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.380

Provision of outside services—Licensee's duty of care/negligence.

(1) The assisted living facility licensee shall permit the resident, or the resident's legal representative if any, to independently arrange for or contract with a practitioner licensed under Title 18 RCW regulating health care professions, or a home health, hospice, or home care agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, to provide on-site care and services to the resident, consistent with RCW 18.20.160 and chapter 70.129 RCW. The licensee may permit the resident, or the resident's legal representative if any, to independently arrange for other persons to provide on-site care and services to the resident.

(2) The assisted living facility licensee may establish policies and procedures that describe limitations, conditions, or requirements that must be met prior to an outside service provider being allowed on-site.

(3) When the resident or the resident's legal representative independently arranges for outside services under subsection (1) of this section, the licensee's duty of care, and any negligence that may be attributed thereto, shall be limited to: The responsibilities described under subsection (4) of this section, excluding supervising the activities of the outside service provider; observation of the resident for changes in overall functioning, consistent with RCW 18.20.280; notification to the person or persons identified in RCW 70.129.030 when there are observed changes in the resident's overall functioning or condition; and appropriately responding to obtain needed assistance when there are observable or reported changes in the resident's physical or mental functioning.

(4) Consistent with RCW 18.20.280, the assisted living facility licensee shall not be responsible for supervising the activities of the outside service provider. When information sharing is authorized by the resident or the resident's legal representative, the licensee shall request such information and integrate relevant information from the outside service provider into the resident's negotiated service agreement, only to the extent that such information is actually shared with the licensee.

[ 2012 c 10 s 27; 2004 c 142 s 10.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective dates—2004 c 142: See note following RCW 18.20.020.